lt-LT_morphology.aff
FLAG num
SFX 8953 Y 2
SFX 8953 arti arti/470 . 336
SFX 8953 artis artis/470 . 336

SFX 8954 Y 2
SFX 8954 arti arti/471 . 336
SFX 8954 artis artis/471 . 336

SFX 8955 Y 2
SFX 8955 arti arti/472 . 336
SFX 8955 artis artis/472 . 336

SFX 8956 Y 2
SFX 8956 arti arti/473 . 336
SFX 8956 artis artis/473 . 336

SFX 8967 Y 2
SFX 8967 arti ąra/474 . 337
SFX 8967 artis ąrasi/474 . 337

SFX 8968 Y 2
SFX 8968 arti ąra/475 . 337
SFX 8968 artis ąrasi/475 . 337

SFX 8969 Y 2
SFX 8969 arti ąra/476 . 337
SFX 8969 artis ąrasi/476 . 337

SFX 8970 Y 2
SFX 8970 arti ąra/477 . 337
SFX 8970 artis ąrasi/477 . 337

SFX 8971 Y 2
SFX 8971 arti ąra/478 . 337
SFX 8971 artis ąrasi/478 . 337

SFX 8972 Y 2
SFX 8972 arti ąra/479 . 337
SFX 8972 artis ąrasi/479 . 337

SFX 8973 Y 2
SFX 8973 arti ąra/480 . 337
SFX 8973 artis ąrasi/480 . 337

SFX 8974 Y 2
SFX 8974 arti ąra/481 . 337
SFX 8974 artis ąrasi/481 . 337

SFX 8975 Y 2
SFX 8975 arti ąra/482 . 337
SFX 8975 artis ąrasi/482 . 337

SFX 8985 Y 1
SFX 8985 arti ąrie/483 . 337

SFX 8986 Y 1
SFX 8986 artis ąrie/484 . 337

SFX 8987 Y 2
SFX 8987 arti aro/485 . 338
SFX 8987 artis arosi/485 . 338

SFX 8988 Y 2
SFX 8988 arti aro/486 . 338
SFX 8988 artis arosi/486 . 338

SFX 8989 Y 2
SFX 8989 arti aro/487 . 338
SFX 8989 artis arosi/487 . 338

SFX 8993 Y 2
SFX 8993 irpti irpti/464 . 336
SFX 8993 irptis irptis/464 . 336

SFX 8994 Y 2
SFX 8994 irpti irpti/465 . 336
SFX 8994 irptis irptis/465 . 336

SFX 8995 Y 2
SFX 8995 irpti irpti/466 . 336
SFX 8995 irptis irptis/466 . 336

SFX 8996 Y 2
SFX 8996 irpti irpti/467 . 336
SFX 8996 irptis irptis/467 . 336

SFX 8997 Y 2
SFX 8997 irpti irpti/468 . 336
SFX 8997 irptis irptis/468 . 336

SFX 8998 Y 2
SFX 8998 irpti irpti/469 . 336
SFX 8998 irptis irptis/469 . 336

SFX 8999 Y 2
SFX 8999 irpti irpti/470 . 336
SFX 8999 irptis irptis/470 . 336

SFX 9000 Y 2
SFX 9000 irpti irpti/471 . 336
SFX 9000 irptis irptis/471 . 336

SFX 9001 Y 2
SFX 9001 irpti irpti/472 . 336
SFX 9001 irptis irptis/472 . 336

SFX 9002 Y 2
SFX 9002 irpti irpti/473 . 336
SFX 9002 irptis irptis/473 . 336

SFX 9013 Y 2
SFX 9013 irpti erpa/474 . 337
SFX 9013 irptis erpasi/474 . 337

SFX 9014 Y 2
SFX 9014 irpti erpa/475 . 337
SFX 9014 irptis erpasi/475 . 337

SFX 9015 Y 2
SFX 9015 irpti erpa/476 . 337
SFX 9015 irptis erpasi/476 . 337

SFX 9016 Y 2
SFX 9016 irpti erpa/477 . 337
SFX 9016 irptis erpasi/477 . 337

SFX 9017 Y 2
SFX 9017 irpti erpa/478 . 337
SFX 9017 irptis erpasi/478 . 337

SFX 9018 Y 2
SFX 9018 irpti erpa/479 . 337
SFX 9018 irptis erpasi/479 . 337

SFX 9019 Y 2
SFX 9019 irpti erpa/480 . 337
SFX 9019 irptis erpasi/480 . 337

SFX 9020 Y 2
SFX 9020 irpti erpa/481 . 337
SFX 9020 irptis erpasi/481 . 337

SFX 9021 Y 2
SFX 9021 irpti erpa/482 . 337
SFX 9021 irptis erpasi/482 . 337

SFX 9031 Y 1
SFX 9031 irpti erpie/483 . 337

SFX 9032 Y 1
SFX 9032 irptis erpie/484 . 337

SFX 9033 Y 2
SFX 9033 irpti irpo/485 . 338
SFX 9033 irptis irposi/485 . 338

SFX 9034 Y 2
SFX 9034 irpti irpo/486 . 338
SFX 9034 irptis irposi/486 . 338

SFX 9035 Y 2
SFX 9035 irpti irpo/487 . 338
SFX 9035 irptis irposi/487 . 338

SFX 9039 Y 2
SFX 9039 iti iti/464 . 336
SFX 9039 itis itis/464 . 336

SFX 9040 Y 2
SFX 9040 iti iti/465 . 336
SFX 9040 itis itis/465 . 336

SFX 9041 Y 2
SFX 9041 iti iti/466 . 336
SFX 9041 itis itis/466 . 336

SFX 9042 Y 2
SFX 9042 iti iti/467 . 336
SFX 9042 itis itis/467 . 336

SFX 9043 Y 2
SFX 9043 iti iti/468 . 336
SFX 9043 itis itis/468 . 336

SFX 9044 Y 2
SFX 9044 iti iti/469 . 336
SFX 9044 itis itis/469 . 336

SFX 9045 Y 2
SFX 9045 iti iti/470 . 336
SFX 9045 itis itis/470 . 336

SFX 9046 Y 2
SFX 9046 iti iti/471 . 336
SFX 9046 itis itis/471 . 336

SFX 9047 Y 2
SFX 9047 iti iti/472 . 336
SFX 9047 itis itis/472 . 336

SFX 9048 Y 2
SFX 9048 iti iti/473 . 336
SFX 9048 itis itis/473 . 336

SFX 9059 Y 2
SFX 9059 iti ja/474 . 337
SFX 9059 itis jasi/474 . 337

SFX 9060 Y 2
SFX 9060 iti ja/475 . 337
SFX 9060 itis jasi/475 . 337

SFX 9061 Y 2
SFX 9061 iti ja/476 . 337
SFX 9061 itis jasi/476 . 337

SFX 9062 Y 2
SFX 9062 iti ja/477 . 337
SFX 9062 itis jasi/477 . 337

SFX 9063 Y 2
SFX 9063 iti ja/478 . 337
SFX 9063 itis jasi/478 . 337

SFX 9064 Y 2
SFX 9064 iti ja/479 . 337
SFX 9064 itis jasi/479 . 337

SFX 9065 Y 2
SFX 9065 iti ja/480 . 337
SFX 9065 itis jasi/480 . 337

SFX 9066 Y 2
SFX 9066 iti ja/481 . 337
SFX 9066 itis jasi/481 . 337

SFX 9067 Y 2
SFX 9067 iti ja/482 . 337
SFX 9067 itis jasi/482 . 337

SFX 9077 Y 1
SFX 9077 iti jie/483 . 337

SFX 9078 Y 1
SFX 9078 itis jie/484 . 337

SFX 9079 Y 2
SFX 9079 iti jo/485 . 338
SFX 9079 itis josi/485 . 338

SFX 9080 Y 2
SFX 9080 iti jo/486 . 338
SFX 9080 itis josi/486 . 338

SFX 9081 Y 2
SFX 9081 iti jo/487 . 338
SFX 9081 itis josi/487 . 338

SFX 9085 Y 2
SFX 9085 ulti ulti/464 . 336
SFX 9085 ultis ultis/464 . 336

SFX 9086 Y 2
SFX 9086 ulti ulti/465 . 336
SFX 9086 ultis ultis/465 . 336

SFX 9087 Y 2
SFX 9087 ulti ulti/466 . 336
SFX 9087 ultis ultis/466 . 336

SFX 9088 Y 2
SFX 9088 ulti ulti/467 . 336
SFX 9088 ultis ultis/467 . 336

SFX 9089 Y 2
SFX 9089 ulti ulti/468 . 336
SFX 9089 ultis ultis/468 . 336

SFX 9090 Y 2
SFX 9090 ulti ulti/469 . 336
SFX 9090 ultis ultis/469 . 336

SFX 9091 Y 2
SFX 9091 ulti ulti/470 . 336
SFX 9091 ultis ultis/470 . 336

SFX 9092 Y 2
SFX 9092 ulti ulti/471 . 336
SFX 9092 ultis ultis/471 . 336

SFX 9093 Y 2
SFX 9093 ulti ulti/472 . 336
SFX 9093 ultis ultis/472 . 336

SFX 9094 Y 2
SFX 9094 ulti ulti/473 . 336
SFX 9094 ultis ultis/473 . 336

SFX 9105 Y 2
SFX 9105 ulti ulia/474 . 337
SFX 9105 ultis uliasi/474 . 337

SFX 9106 Y 2
SFX 9106 ulti ulia/475 . 337
SFX 9106 ultis uliasi/475 . 337

SFX 9107 Y 2
SFX 9107 ulti ulia/476 . 337
SFX 9107 ultis uliasi/476 . 337

SFX 9108 Y 2
SFX 9108 ulti ulia/477 . 337
SFX 9108 ultis uliasi/477 . 337

SFX 9109 Y 2
SFX 9109 ulti ulia/478 . 337
SFX 9109 ultis uliasi/478 . 337

SFX 9110 Y 2
SFX 9110 ulti ulia/479 . 337
SFX 9110 ultis uliasi/479 . 337

SFX 9111 Y 2
SFX 9111 ulti ulia/480 . 337
SFX 9111 ultis uliasi/480 . 337

SFX 9112 Y 2
SFX 9112 ulti ulia/481 . 337
SFX 9112 ultis uliasi/481 . 337

SFX 9113 Y 2
SFX 9113 ulti ulia/482 . 337
SFX 9113 ultis uliasi/482 . 337

SFX 9123 Y 1
SFX 9123 ulti ulie/483 . 337

SFX 9124 Y 1
SFX 9124 ultis ulie/484 . 337

SFX 9125 Y 2
SFX 9125 ulti ūlė/485 . 338
SFX 9125 ultis ūlėsi/485 . 338

SFX 9126 Y 2
SFX 9126 ulti ūlė/486 . 338
SFX 9126 ultis ūlėsi/486 . 338

SFX 9127 Y 2
SFX 9127 ulti ūlė/487 . 338
SFX 9127 ultis ūlėsi/487 . 338

SFX 9131 Y 2
SFX 9131 uoti uoti/464 . 336
SFX 9131 uotis uotis/464 . 336

SFX 9132 Y 2
SFX 9132 uoti uoti/465 . 336
SFX 9132 uotis uotis/465 . 336

SFX 9133 Y 2
SFX 9133 uoti uoti/466 . 336
SFX 9133 uotis uotis/466 . 336

SFX 9134 Y 2
SFX 9134 uoti uoti/467 . 336
SFX 9134 uotis uotis/467 . 336

SFX 9135 Y 2
SFX 9135 uoti uoti/468 . 336
SFX 9135 uotis uotis/468 . 336

SFX 9136 Y 2
SFX 9136 uoti uoti/469 . 336
SFX 9136 uotis uotis/469 . 336

SFX 9137 Y 2
SFX 9137 uoti uoti/470 . 336
SFX 9137 uotis uotis/470 . 336

SFX 9138 Y 2
SFX 9138 uoti uoti/471 . 336
SFX 9138 uotis uotis/471 . 336

SFX 9139 Y 2
SFX 9139 uoti uoti/472 . 336
SFX 9139 uotis uotis/472 . 336

SFX 9140 Y 2
SFX 9140 uoti uoti/473 . 336
SFX 9140 uotis uotis/473 . 336

SFX 9151 Y 2
SFX 9151 uoti uoja/474 . 337
SFX 9151 uotis uojasi/474 . 337

SFX 9152 Y 2
SFX 9152 uoti uoja/475 . 337
SFX 9152 uotis uojasi/475 . 337

SFX 9153 Y 2
SFX 9153 uoti uoja/476 . 337
SFX 9153 uotis uojasi/476 . 337

SFX 9154 Y 2
SFX 9154 uoti uoja/477 . 337
SFX 9154 uotis uojasi/477 . 337

SFX 9155 Y 2
SFX 9155 uoti uoja/478 . 337
SFX 9155 uotis uojasi/478 . 337

SFX 9156 Y 2
SFX 9156 uoti uoja/479 . 337
SFX 9156 uotis uojasi/479 . 337

SFX 9157 Y 2
SFX 9157 uoti uoja/480 . 337
SFX 9157 uotis uojasi/480 . 337

SFX 9158 Y 2
SFX 9158 uoti uoja/481 . 337
SFX 9158 uotis uojasi/481 . 337

SFX 9159 Y 2
SFX 9159 uoti uoja/482 . 337
SFX 9159 uotis uojasi/482 . 337

SFX 9169 Y 1
SFX 9169 uoti uojie/483 . 337

SFX 9170 Y 1
SFX 9170 uotis uojie/484 . 337

SFX 9171 Y 2
SFX 9171 uoti avė/485 . 338
SFX 9171 uotis avėsi/485 . 338

AF 8993,8994,9013,9033,65521 # 159
AF 9085,9086,9105,9125,65521 # 161
AF 9131,9132,9151,9171,65521 # 186
AF 9039,9040,9059,9079,65521 # 311
AF 8947,8948,8967,8987,65521 # 393
