lt-LT_morphology.dic
apkirpti/159	11
apkulti/161	11
apsikirpti/159	13
apsikulti/161	13
apsišluoti/186	13
apšluoti/186	11
atkirpti/159	11
atsikirpti/159	13
besišluoti/186	13
guiti/311	11
įkirpti/159	11
įsikirpti/159	13
išguiti/311	11
iškirpti/159	11
iškulti/161	11
išsikirpti/159	13
išsikulti/161	13
išsišluoti/186	13
iššluoti/186	11
išuiti/311	11
kirpti/159	11
kirptis/159	13
kulti/161	11
kultis/161	13
neapkirpti/159	33
neapkulti/161	33
neapsikirpti/159	34
neapsišluoti/186	34
neapšluoti/186	33
neatkirpti/159	33
nebekirpti/159	33
nebekulti/161	33
nebenukulti/161	33
nebesikirpti/159	34
nebešluoti/186	33
nebeužguiti/311	33
nebezuiti/311	33
neguiti/311	33
neįkirpti/159	33
neišguiti/311	33
neiškirpti/159	33
neiškulti/161	33
neišsišluoti/186	34
neiššluoti/186	33
nekirpti/159	33
nekulti/161	33
nenukirpti/159	33
nenukulti/161	33
nenusikirpti/159	34
nenusišluoti/186	34
nenušluoti/186	33
nepakirpti/159	33
nepasišluoti/186	34
nepašluoti/186	33
neperkarti/393	33
neperkirpti/159	33
neprakirpti/159	33
neprikirpti/159	33
neprikulti/161	33
nesikirpti/159	34
nesikulti/161	34
nesišluoti/186	34
nesukirpti/159	33
nesukulti/161	33
nesusikulti/161	34
nesusišluoti/186	34
nesušluoti/186	33
nešluoti/186	33
neuiti/311	33
neužguiti/311	33
nezuiti/311	33
nukirpti/159	11
nukulti/161	11
nusikirpti/159	13
nusišluoti/186	13
nušluoti/186	11
pakirpti/159	11
pasikirpti/159	13
pasikulti/161	13
pasišluoti/186	13
pašluoti/186	11
perkarti/393	11
perkirpti/159	11
prakirpti/159	11
prasišluoti/186	13
prašluoti/186	11
prikirpti/159	11
prikulti/161	11
prisišluoti/186	13
prišluoti/186	11
sukirpti/159	11
sukulti/161	11
susikulti/161	13
susišluoti/186	13
sušluoti/186	11
šluoti/186	11
šluotis/186	13
tebekirpti/159	11
tebekulti/161	11
tebešluoti/186	11
tebezuiti/311	11
teiškirpti/159	11
tekirpti/159	11
tenukulti/161	11
teprikulti/161	11
tešluoti/186	11
tezuiti/311	11
uiti/311	11
užguiti/311	11
užkulti/161	11
užšluoti/186	11
užuiti/311	11
zuiti/311	11
